Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-505
Distribution
of program funds.

(1) To the extent that funds are available,
program funds shall be distributed as follows:

(a) After completing
the first year of service under the contract, the veterinarian is eligible
to receive up to fifteen thousand dollars;

(b) After completing
the second year of service under the contract, the veterinarian is eligible
to receive up to fifteen thousand dollars;

(c) After completing
the third year of service under the contract, the veterinarian is eligible
to receive up to twenty-five thousand dollars; and

(d) After completing
the fourth year of service under the contract, the veterinarian is eligible
to receive up to twenty-five thousand dollars.

(2) If the veterinarian
does not complete an entire year of service or if sufficient funds are not
available to provide the full dollar amount of incentive in a year, the amount
distributed under this section for that year shall be prorated.

Laws
2008, LB1172, § 5.